Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.430

Election of convention delegates—Date.

The date for holding the election of delegates must be not less than one month nor more than six weeks before the date of holding the convention. If a general election is to be held not more than six months nor less than three months from the date of official notice of submission to the state of the proposed amendment, the governor must fix the date of the general election as the date for the election of delegates to the convention.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1432; 1965 c 9 s 29.74.030. Prior: (i) 1933 c 181 s 1, part; RRS s 5249-1, part. (ii) 1933 c 181 s 9; RRS s 5249-9. Formerly RCW 29.74.030.]